Louisiana, session 2026, HB320.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:406 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§406. Unlawful exposure by an inmate
A. It is unlawful for an adult inmate who is incarcerated in an adult facility
to expose his or her intimate parts to any correctional facility employee with the
intent of doing any of the following:
(1) Arousing or gratifying the sexual desires of the inmate.
(2) Intimidating or harassing a correctional facility employee.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Correctional facility" means any adult jail, prison, penitentiary,
temporary holding center, or detention facility.
(2) "Correctional facility employee" means an employee of any adult jail,
prison, penitentiary, temporary holding center, or detention facility.
(3) "Intimate parts" means the genitals, pubic hair, anus, vulva, or female
breast nipples of the inmate.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 320 ENROLLED
C.(1) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be imprisoned
with or without hard labor for not more than three years, fined not more than two
thousand five hundred dollars, or both.
(2) Upon a second or subsequent conviction, the offender shall be
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than five years, fined not more
than twenty five thousand dollars, or both.
(3) Any sentence imposed pursuant to this Section shall run consecutively
to any other sentence being served by the offender at the time of the offense.
Section 2. R.S. 15:541(24)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§541. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the definitions of terms in this Section shall
apply:
* * *
(24)(a) "Sex offense" means deferred adjudication, adjudication withheld,
or conviction for the perpetration or attempted perpetration of or conspiracy to
commit human trafficking when prosecuted under the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(B)(2), R.S. 14:46.3 (trafficking of children for sexual purposes), R.S. 14:89
(crime against nature), R.S. 14:89.1 (aggravated crime against nature), R.S.
14:89.2(B)(3) (crime against nature by solicitation), R.S. 14:80 (felony carnal
knowledge of a juvenile), R.S. 14:81 (indecent behavior with juveniles), R.S. 14:81.1
(pornography involving juveniles) which occurred prior to August 1, 2025, R.S.
14:81.2 (molestation of a juvenile or a person with a physical or mental disability),
R.S. 14:81.3 (computer-aided solicitation of a minor), R.S. 14:81.4 (prohibited
sexual conduct between an educator and student), R.S. 14:82.1 (prostitution; persons
under eighteen), R.S. 14:82.2(C)(4) or (5) (purchase of commercial sexual activity),
R.S. 14:83(B)(2) or (3) (soliciting for prostitutes), R.S. 14:92(A)(7) (contributing to
the delinquency of juveniles), R.S. 14:93.5 (sexual battery of persons with
infirmities), R.S. 14:106(A)(5) (obscenity by solicitation of a person under the age
of seventeen), R.S. 14:283 (video voyeurism), R.S. 14:41 (rape), R.S. 14:42
(aggravated or first degree rape), R.S. 14:42.1 (forcible or second degree rape), R.S.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 320 ENROLLED
14:43 (simple or third degree rape), R.S. 14:43.1 (sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.2
(second degree sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.3 (oral sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.5
(intentional exposure to HIV), a second or subsequent conviction of R.S. 14:283.1
(voyeurism), R.S. 14:406 (unlawful exposure by an inmate), or a second or
subsequent conviction of R.S. 14:89.3 (sexual abuse of an animal), committed on or
after June 18, 1992, or committed prior to June 18, 1992, if the person, as a result of
the offense, is under the custody of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
on or after June 18, 1992. A conviction for any offense provided in this definition
includes a conviction for the offense under the laws of another state, or military,
territorial, foreign, tribal, or federal law which is equivalent to an offense provided
for in this Chapter, unless the tribal court or foreign conviction was not obtained with
sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness and due process for the accused as
provided by the federal guidelines adopted pursuant to the Adam Walsh Child
Protection and Safety Act of 2006.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.